District of Columbia statutes.
1-152

Inclusion of “DC” and “No Taxation Without Representation” within District of Columbia flag.

(a)

After the design adopted under subsection (b) of this section becomes effective, the flag of the District of Columbia shall temporarily contain the language “DC” and “No Taxation Without Representation”.

(b)

The placement and design of the language prescribed in subsection (a) of this section shall be established by act of the Council.

(c)

The flag adopted pursuant to § 1-151 and subsection (b) of this section shall be flown officially as of 90 days following the effective date of the act specified in subsection (b) of this section.

(d)

The language prescribed in subsection (a) of this section shall be removed from the flag when District of Columbia registered voters are able to vote for 2 Senators and one Representative with full rights and privileges in the Congress of the United States.

(e)

The language prescribed in subsection (a) of this section shall not be required in instances where a reproduction of the flag is placed as a symbol on motor vehicles, District of Columbia government letterhead, or other objects.

(f)

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the District government and any person may officially display a District of Columbia flag that contains the language “DC” and “No Taxation Without Representation” on June 14 of each year, known as Flag Day, until a design is officially adopted by the Council pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

Mar. 25, 2003, D.C. Law 14-237, § 3, 49 DCR 10485
Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-239, § 2, 59 DCR 14788
This section is referenced in § 1-154 and § 1-172.
2001 Ed., § 1-172.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-239 added (f).